Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. Commissioner

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance § 31; 63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Officers and Employees §§ 16, 17; 72 Am. Jur. 2d States, Territories and Dependencies § 61.

§ 26-2-101.
Department of insurance established.

There is established the department of insurance.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 75, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 227; R.S. 1931, § 57-101; C.S. 1945, § 52-101; Laws 1957, ch. 236, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26-1; Laws 1963, ch. 108, § 1; 1967, ch. 136, § 16; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-2-102.
Insurance commissioner; appointment; vacancy; removal from office; other requirements.

The chief officer of the department is the “insurance commissioner”.

The commissioner shall be appointed by the governor.

If for any cause a vacancy occurs in the office of commissioner, the governor shall fill the vacancy in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

.

The governor may remove a commissioner as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 75, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 227; R.S. 1931, § 57-101; C.S. 1945, § 52-101; Laws 1957, ch. 236, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26-1; Laws 1963, ch. 108, § 1; 1967, ch. 136, § 17; 1971, ch. 190, § 11; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

§ 26-2-103.
Insurance commissioner; eligibility for appointment.

No individual is eligible for appointment to or shall hold the office of commissioner unless he is a qualified elector of this state and free of conflicting interests as specified in W.S.

26-2-107

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-18; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-2-104.
Insurance commissioner; official seal.

The commissioner shall have an official seal in the form and design in use and on file in the office of secretary of state.

The commissioner shall issue under his official seal all his certificates, other than licenses of agents, brokers, adjusters and other insurance representatives.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 75, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 229; R.S. 1931, § 57-103; C.S. 1945, § 52-103; Laws 1957, ch. 236, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 26-4; Laws 1963, ch. 108, § 3; 1967, ch. 136, § 20; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-2-105.
Insurance commissioner; salary.

The commissioner shall receive a salary as provided under W.S.

9-2-3207

.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 75, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 228; R.S. 1931, § 57-102; Laws 1945, ch. 142, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 52-102; Laws 1949, ch. 65, § 26; 1951, ch. 44, § 19; 1953, ch. 139, § 19; 1957, ch. 157, § 31; ch. 236, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 26-2; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 37; 1965, ch. 115, § 38, 1967, ch. 146, § 21; 1969, ch. 168, § 25; 1971, ch. 190, § 10; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to payment of salaries of state officers, see §

9-3-101

.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3207" for "9-2-1022."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 26-2-106.
Deputy commissioner, examiners, clerks, assistants and consultants.

The commissioner, with the governor’s approval, may appoint a deputy commissioner and may revoke the appointment at his pleasure.

The commissioner may appoint examiners, clerks and other necessary assistants as the proper conduct of his office requires, and may revoke the appointments at his pleasure. In the appointment of examiners the commissioner shall consider standards of qualification the National Association of Insurance Commissioners recommends.

Salary for personnel in subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be as provided under W.S.

9-2-3207

.

The commissioner may contract for independent or consulting actuarial, rating or other technical services, on a fee basis, without giving the individual status as a state employee.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 75, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 231; Laws 1921, ch. 95, § 29; R.S. 1931, § 57-105; Laws 1933, ch. 103, § 13; 1945, ch. 142, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 52-105; Laws 1947, ch. 75, § 1; 1949, ch. 65, § 27; 1951, ch. 44, § 20; 1953, ch. 139, § 20; 1957, ch. 157, § 32; ch. 236, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 26-3; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 38; 1963, ch. 108, § 2; 1965, ch. 115, § 39; 1967, ch. 136, § 22; 1971, ch. 27, § 8; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

substituted “9-2-3207” for “9-2-1022” in (c).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 26-2-107.
Conflict of interest prohibited; additional compensation prohibited.

The commissioner or his deputy, or any examiner, assistant or employee of the department shall not:

Be connected with the management of or be financially interested in any insurer, insurance agency or insurance transaction except as a policyholder or claimant under a policy;

Engage in any other business or occupation interfering or inconsistent with department duties, except that as to those matters in which a conflict of interest does not exist on the part of any individual, the commissioner may employ or retain insurance actuaries, accountants or other technicians who are independently practicing their professions even though similarly employed or retained by insurers or others; or

Be given or receive any fee, compensation, loan, gift or other thing of value in addition to the compensation and expense allowance provided by law.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 23; W.S. 1957, 26.1-23; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-2-108.
Commissioner; delegation of authority.

The commissioner may delegate to his deputy or any department employee the exercise or discharge in the commissioner’s name of any power, duty, or function vested in or imposed upon the commissioner under this code [title 26], other than the supervision of department operations.

The official act of any individual acting in the commissioner’s name and by his authority is an official act of the commissioner. The commissioner is responsible for all such acts.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-24; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-2-109.
Commissioner; powers and duties generally.

The commissioner shall:

Personally supervise the department operations;

Examine and inquire into violations of this code [title 26];

Enforce this code with impartiality;

Execute the duties imposed upon him by this code;

Have the powers and authority expressly conferred upon him by or reasonably implied from this code;

Immediately pay to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund, unless otherwise specifically provided, any monies paid to him under this code;

Have any additional powers and duties as may be provided by other laws of this state.

The commissioner may conduct examinations and investigations of insurance matters, in addition to examinations and investigations expressly authorized, as he deems proper, upon reasonable and probable cause, to determine whether any person has violated any provisions of this code or to secure information useful in the lawful administration of any provision of this code. The cost of any additional examinations and investigations shall be borne by the state.

The commissioner, with the governor’s approval, may enter into interstate compacts with other states in the region to provide for a uniform climate for insurance coverage in the compacting states. The compacts may include:

Interstate compacts to negotiate uniform rating structures in the compacting states;

Interstate compacts to negotiate the use of regional ratings or trendings rather than national ratings or trendings; or

Interstate compacts to provide for the operation of mutual companies to provide insurance for risks that are critical to the health, safety or welfare of the compacting states.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 9, § 3.

The commissioner may request a waiver from the NAIC’s financial regulation standards and accreditation program requirements when the commissioner deems the waiver to be in the interest of the state. The commissioner shall report in writing any waiver request to the joint corporations, elections and political subdivisions interim committee within thirty (30) days of the request.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 1; 1931, ch. 26, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-201; C.S. 1945, § 52-301; W.S. 1957, §§ 26.1-25, 26-57; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 25; 1976, ch. 19, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

26-2-109

,

26-38-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2017 ch. 9, § 3, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 10, § 1, effective February 14, 2019.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, repealed former (d), which read: “Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the commissioner does not have any powers, duties or responsibilities with respect to the state board of insurance agent's examiners, except as expressly provided in chapter 10 of this code.”

The 2019 amendment,

added “(e) The commissioner may request a waiver from the NAIC’s financial regulation standards and accreditation program requirements when the commissioner deems the waiver to be in the interest of the state. The commissioner shall report in writing any waiver request to the joint corporations, elections and political subdivisions interim committee within thirty (30) days of the request.”

Laws 2019, ch. 10, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 14, 2019.

Commissioner has authority to regulate private mortgage insurance. —

Mortgage Guar. Ins. Corp. v. Langdon, 634 P.2d 509,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1981).

There has not been improper or unconstitutional delegation of power to commissioner

pursuant to the Mortgage Guar. Ins. Corp. v. Langdon, 634 P.2d 509,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1981).

Improper to grant injunctive relief requested by commissioner until parties' obligations ascertained. —

It would be improper to grant certain injunctive relief requested by the insurance commissioner, i.e., the direct payment of the tax debt of an unknown amount for certain years, the direct report of the proportion of the premiums collected on persons, subjects or risks located or resident in Wyoming and covered by policies in which such risks are in more than one state, and the payment of fines as civil penalties, where the obligation for the payment of such taxes has not been ascertained and the companies involved have not been requested to make the designated reports or pay the taxes. Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982).

Applied

in

State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Ins. Dep't, 793 P.2d 1008,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1990).

§ 26-2-110.
Rules and regulations.

Subject to the requirements of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, the commissioner may make reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out any provision of this code. No rule or regulation shall extend, modify or conflict with any law of this state or the reasonable implications thereof.

Any interested person may petition the commissioner requesting the promulgation, amendment or repeal of any rule or regulation, under the applicable procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

In addition to any other penalty under this code, willful violation of any provision of this code or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto subjects the violator to suspension or revocation of a certificate of authority or license as may be applicable. No penalty applies to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with the rule or regulation, notwithstanding that after the act or omission the rule or regulation may be amended or rescinded or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid.

In addition to all other rulemaking authority granted to the commissioner, the commissioner may promulgate necessary and appropriate rules to satisfy NAIC accreditation requirements, provided that:

The commissioner has determined promulgation of the rules is in the interest of the state and the rules are otherwise appropriate;

The rules shall not be in effect for longer than three (3) years; and

The commissioner has requested a waiver, if determined appropriate, to the applicable NAIC accreditation requirement pursuant to W.S. 26-2-109(e).

The commissioner may promulgate rules to identify procedures for conducting examinations of the Wyoming state employees’ and officials’ group insurance program in accordance with W.S. 9-3-205(c).

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 1; 1931, ch. 26, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-201; C.S. 1945, § 52-301; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-57, 26.1-2; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 26; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2019 ch. 10, § 1, effective February 14, 2019; 2020 ch. 46, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Applied

in

State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Ins. Dep't, 793 P.2d 1008,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

Billings v. Wyoming Bd. of Outfitters & Guides, 2001 WY 81, 30 P.3d 557,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2001).

The 2019 amendment,

added "(d)
In addition to all other rulemaking authority granted to the commissioner, the commissioner may promulgate necessary and appropriate rules to satisfy NAIC accreditation requirements, provided that:"; added "(d)(i)
The commissioner has determined promulgation of the rules is in the interest of the state and the rules are otherwise appropriate;"; added (d)(ii)
The rules shall not be in effect for longer than three (3) years; and"; added "(d)(iii)
The commissioner has requested a waiver, if determined appropriate, to the applicable NAIC accreditation requirement pursuant to W.S. 26-2-109(e)."

Laws 2019, ch. 10, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 14, 2019.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (e).

§ 26-2-111.
Orders and notices of commissioner; contents; delivery.

Orders and notices of the commissioner are effective only when in writing signed by him or by his authority.

Except as otherwise expressly provided by law as to particular orders, any order of the commissioner shall concisely state:

Its effective date;

Its intent or purpose;

The grounds on which based;

The provisions of this code [title 26] pursuant to which action is so taken or proposed to be taken, but failure to designate a particular provision does not deprive the commissioner of the right to rely on that provision.

Except as may be provided as to particular procedures, an order or notice may be given by delivery to the person to be ordered or notified or by mailing it, postage prepaid, addressed to him at his principal place of business or residence as last of record in the department. The order or notice is deemed to have been given when so mailed.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-27; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-2-112.
Enforcement of code and orders; injunctions; penalty for violation of orders.

The commissioner, upon the advice of and through the attorney general, may invoke the aid of the courts through injunction or other proper process to enforce any proper order he makes or action he takes.

If the commissioner has reason to believe that any person has violated any provision of this code [title 26], or any provision of other law applicable to insurance operations, for which criminal prosecution is provided and would be in order, he shall give the information relative thereto to the attorney general or to the district attorney for the county having jurisdiction of the violation. The attorney general or district attorney shall promptly institute any action or proceedings against the person as in his opinion the information requires or justifies.

In addition to any other applicable penalty, any person who violates a lawful order of the commissioner, upon proof thereof to the court’s satisfaction, shall pay to this state a sum not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or if the violation is found to be willful, a sum not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000.00). Any penalty may be recovered in a civil action against the violator.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 57-206; C.S. 1945, § 52-306; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-58, 26.1-28; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 28; 1981, Sp. Sess. ch. 22, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Mandamus. —

For decision construing repealed provisions similar to section, see State ex rel. Coddington v. Loucks, 30 Wyo. 485, 222 P. 37,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1924).

Improper to grant injunctive relief requested by commissioneruntil parties' obligations ascertained. —

It would be improper to grant certain injunctive relief requested by the insurance commissioner, i.e., the direct payment of the tax debt of an unknown amount for certain years, the direct report of the proportion of the premiums collected on persons, subjects or risks located or resident in Wyoming and covered by policies in which such risks are in more than one state, and the payment of fines as civil penalties, where the obligation for the payment of such taxes has not been ascertained and the companies involved have not been requested to make the designated reports or pay the taxes. Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 26-2-113.
Records and other papers; generally.

The commissioner shall:

File in the department and safely keep all statements, reports, filings and papers required by law;

Preserve in the department in permanent form records of his proceedings, hearings, investigations and examinations;

Keep a suitable record of all insurer certificates of authority and of all licenses issued under this code [title 26] together with all applicable suspensions and revocations and of the causes thereof.

The records and filings in the department are open to public inspection, except as otherwise provided by this code.

The commissioner may destroy unneeded or obsolete records and filings in the department in accordance with general provisions and procedures applicable to administrative agencies of this state.

In order to assist in the performance of his duties under this code, the commissioner may:

Share documents, materials or other information, including confidential and privileged documents, materials or information, with other state, federal and international regulatory agencies, with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates or subsidiaries, and with state, federal and international law enforcement authorities, including members of any supervisory college described in W.S.

26-44-118

, provided the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of any document, material or other information and has verified in writing the legal authority to maintain confidentiality;

Receive documents, materials or information, including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials or information, from the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates or subsidiaries and from regulatory and law enforcement officials of other foreign or domestic jurisdictions, and shall maintain as confidential or privileged any document, material or information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material or information; and

Enter into agreements governing sharing and use of information consistent with this subsection.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 75, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 233; R.S. 1931, § 57-107; C.S. 1945, § 52-107; Laws 1957, ch. 236, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 26-5; Laws 1963, ch. 108, § 4; 1967, ch. 136, § 29; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, § 1; 2013 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

For provision as to destruction or disposition of public records, see §

9-2-412

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “including members of any supervisory college described in W.S.

26-44-118

,” following
“enforcement authorities,”; added “in writing” following “recipient agrees”; and added “and has verified in writing the legal authority to maintain confidentiality” following “other information in (d)(i).

§ 26-2-114.
Records and other papers; reproductions and certified copies.

Reproductions of records or documents on file in the department, when certified by the commissioner, shall be received in evidence in all proceedings and courts and have the same effect and force as the originals.

Upon request of any person and payment of the applicable fee, the commissioner shall furnish a certified copy of any record or document in the department which is then subject to public inspection.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 30; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-30; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-2-115.
Report to governor.

The commissioner, as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

, shall report to the governor showing:

A list of authorized insurers transacting insurance in this state, with any tabular summary of their financial statements as he deems appropriate;

Names of all insurers whose business was closed during the preceding reporting period, the cause thereof and the amount of assets and liabilities as ascertainable;

Names of insurers against which delinquency or similar proceedings were instituted, and a concise statement of the facts with respect to each proceeding and the status thereof;

The department receipts and expenses for the preceding reporting period;

His recommendations as to amendments or supplementation of laws affecting insurance or the department; and

Any other matters he deems proper or of benefit to the public in regard to the insurance business in this state.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 1; 1931, ch. 26, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-201; C.S. 1945, § 52-301; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-57, 26.1-31; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 31; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-2-116.
Examination of insurers.

For the purpose of determining financial condition, ability to fulfill and manner of fulfillment of its obligations, the nature of its operations and compliance with law, the commissioner or any of his examiners may examine any insurer as often as he, in his sole discretion, deems advisable. He shall examine each insurer licensed in this state not less frequently than every five (5) years. Examination of a reciprocal insurer may include examination of its attorney-in-fact as to its transactions relating to the insurer. Examination of an alien insurer may be limited to its insurance transactions and affairs in the United States, except as the commissioner otherwise requires. In scheduling and determining the nature, scope and frequency of the examinations the commissioner shall consider such matters as the results of financial statement analyses and ratios, changes in management or ownership, actuarial opinions, reports of independent certified public accountants and other criteria as set forth in the Examiners’ Handbook adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and in effect when the commissioner exercises discretion under this section.

The commissioner shall in like manner examine each insurer applying for an initial certificate of authority to transact insurance in this state.

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 59, § 3.

In lieu of making his own examination of any foreign or alien insurer licensed in this state, the commissioner may accept an examination report on the company as prepared by the insurance department for the company’s state of domicile or port of entry state until January 1, 1994. Thereafter, such reports may only be accepted if:

The insurance department preparing the report was, at the time of the examination, accredited under the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ financial regulation standards and accreditation program; or

The examination is performed under the supervision of an accredited insurance department or with the participation of one (1) or more examiners who are employed by an accredited insurance department and who, after the review of the examination work papers and report, state under oath that the examination was performed in a manner consistent with the standards and procedures required by their insurance department.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 146, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-301; C.S. 1945, § 52-201; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-48, 26.1-32; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 32; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1992, ch. 59, §§ 2, 3; 1993, ch. 134, § 1.

§ 26-2-117.
Examination of other than insurers.

For the purpose of ascertaining compliance with law, or relationships and transactions between any person and any insurer or proposed insurer, the commissioner, as often as he deems advisable, may examine the accounts, records, documents and transactions pertaining to or affecting insurance affairs or proposed insurance affairs of any person:

Who is or holds himself out to be an insurance agent, broker, general agent, adjuster or insurer representative;

Having a contract under which he enjoys in fact the exclusive or dominant right to manage or control an insurer;

Holding the shares of voting stock or the policyholder proxies of a domestic insurer, for the purpose of controlling the management thereof, as voting trustee or otherwise;

Engaged in or in any way involved or proposing to be involved in this state in the promotion, formation or financing of an insurer or insurance holding corporation, or corporation or other group to finance an insurer or the production of its business.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 146, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-301; C.S. 1945, § 52-201; W.S. 1957, § 26-48; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 33; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 201, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to examination of fraternal benefit societies, see §

26-29-228

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-2-118.
Examinations; generally.

Each examination shall be expeditious, fair and impartial. Upon determining that an examination should be conducted the commissioner or his designee shall issue an examination warrant appointing one (1) or more examiners to perform the examination and instructing them as to the scope of the examination. In conducting the examination the examiner shall observe those guidelines and procedures set forth in the Examiners’ Handbook adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. The commissioner may also employ other guidelines or procedures as the commissioner deems appropriate. No examiner may be appointed by the commissioner if the examiner, either directly or indirectly, has a conflict of interest or is affiliated with the management of or owns a pecuniary interest in any person subject to examination under this act. This subsection shall not be construed to automatically preclude an examiner from being:

A policyholder or claimant under an insurance policy;

A grantor of a mortgage or similar instrument on the examiner’s residence to a regulated entity if done under customary terms and in the ordinary course of business;

An investment owner in shares of regulated diversified investment companies; or

A settlor or beneficiary of a “blind trust” into which any otherwise impermissible holdings have been placed.

For purposes of completing an examination of any insurer under this act, the commissioner may examine or investigate any person, or the business of any person, if in the sole discretion of the commissioner, the examination or investigation is necessary or material to the examination of the insurer.

Any insurer or other person being examined and any officers, directors, employees, agents or other representatives thereof shall make freely available to the commissioner or his examiners all accounts, computer and other records, documents, files, information, assets and matters in his possession or control relating to the subject of the examination and shall facilitate the examination. The officers, directors, employees, agents and other representatives of the insurer or person shall facilitate the examination and aid in the examination so far as it is in their power to do so. The refusal of any insurer, by its officers, directors, employees, agents or other representatives to submit to examination or to comply with any reasonable written request of the examiners shall be grounds for suspension or refusal of, or nonrenewal of any license or authority held by the insurer to engage in an insurance or other business subject to the commissioner’s jurisdiction. Any such proceedings for suspension, revocation or refusal of any license or authority shall be conducted pursuant to W.S.

26-2-125

through

26-2-130

.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 134, § 2.

Neither the commissioner nor any examiner shall remove any record, account, document, file or other property of the person being examined from the offices or place of that person except with that person’s written consent in advance of the removal or pursuant to a court order. This provision does not affect the making and removal of copies or abstracts of any record, account, document or file.

When making an examination under W.S.

26-2-116

through

26-2-124

, the commissioner may retain attorneys, appraisers, independent actuaries, independent certified public accountants or other professionals and specialists as examiners, the reasonable and appropriate cost shall be borne by the insurer which is the subject of the examination. Notwithstanding the conflict of interest provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the commissioner may retain from time to time, on an individual basis, qualified actuaries, certified public accountants or other similar individuals who are independently practicing their professions, even though the persons may from time to time be similarly employed or retained by persons subject to examination under this act.

Nothing contained in W.S.

26-2-116

through

26-2-124

shall be construed to limit the commissioner’s authority to terminate or suspend any examination in order to pursue other legal or regulatory action pursuant to the insurance laws of this state. Findings of fact and conclusions made pursuant to any examination shall be prima facie evidence in any legal or regulatory action.

Nothing contained in W.S.

26-2-116

through

26-2-124

shall be construed to limit the commissioner’s authority to use and, if appropriate, to make public any final or preliminary examination report, any examiner or company work papers or other documents, or any other information discovered or developed during the course of any examination in the furtherance of any legal or regulatory action which the commissioner may, in his sole discretion, deem appropriate.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 146, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-301; C.S. 1945, § 52-201; W.S. 1957, § 26-48; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 34; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1993, ch. 134, §§ 1, 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 26-1-102(a)(xxxii).

§ 26-2-119.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 134, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 35, related to examinations and appraisal of persons being examined. For present similar provisions, see § 26-2-118(f).

§ 26-2-120.
Examinations; deceit and obstruction during examination prohibited.

No person shall make or authorize any false certificate, entry, memorandum or writing in or relative to the books, records, files, documents and affairs of the person being examined with the intent to deceive the commissioner or examiner, or otherwise willfully obstruct the examination.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 146, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 57-302; C.S. 1945, § 52-202; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-49, 26.1-36; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 36; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Applied

in

Wyoming Ins. Dep't v. Sierra Life Ins. Co., 599 P.2d 1360,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 453

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 26-2-121.
Examinations; report; contents.

No later than sixty (60) days following completion of the examination the examiner in charge shall make a verified, full and true written report of any examination he makes and shall therein certify under oath the report and his findings. Investigations initiated by the commissioner or his examiners and assistants for the purpose of ascertaining whether an insurer, agent or adjuster has violated any provision of the insurance code are not examinations within the provisions of this section.

The report shall contain only information appearing upon the books, records, documents and papers of or relating to the insurer, its agents or other person or affairs being examined, or ascertained from testimony of its officers, agents or other individuals under oath concerning the affairs of that insurer or person, together with any conclusions and recommendations as may reasonably be warranted by the information.

Upon receipt of the verified report the commissioner shall transmit the report to the insurer examined, together with a notice which shall afford the insurer examined a reasonable opportunity of not more than thirty (30) days to make a written submission or rebuttal with respect to any matters contained in the examination report. Upon written request by the insurer filed within the thirty (30) day period, the commissioner shall grant a hearing on the report and shall not file the report until after the hearing and after any appropriate modifications to the report.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 134, § 2.

and (e) Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 134, § 2.

Within thirty (30) days of the end of the period allowed for the receipt of written submissions or rebuttals or within thirty (30) days after conclusion of a hearing held pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the commissioner shall fully consider and review the report, together with any written submissions or rebuttals and any relevant portions of the examiner’s work papers and enter an order:

Adopting the examination report as filed or with modification or corrections. If the examination report reveals that the insurer is operating in violation of any law, regulation or prior order of the commissioner, the commissioner may order the company to take any action the commissioner considers necessary and appropriate to cure the violation;

Rejecting the examination report with directions to the examiners to reopen the examination for purposes of obtaining additional data, documentation or information, and refiling pursuant to this section; or

Calling for an investigatory hearing with no less than twenty (20) days notice to the company for purposes of obtaining additional documentation, data, information and testimony.

All orders entered pursuant to paragraph (f)(i) of this section shall be accompanied by findings and conclusions resulting from the commissioner’s consideration and review of the examination report, relevant examiner work papers and any written submissions or rebuttals. Any such order shall be considered a final administrative decision and may be appealed pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and shall be served upon the insurer by certified mail, together with a copy of the adopted examination report. Within thirty (30) days of the issuance of the adopted report, the company shall file affidavits executed by each of its directors stating under oath that they have received a copy of the adopted report and related orders.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code any hearing conducted under paragraph (f)(iii) of this section by the commissioner or authorized representative, shall be conducted as a nonadversarial confidential investigatory proceeding as necessary for the resolution of any inconsistencies, discrepancies or disputed issues apparent upon the face of the filed examination report or raised by or as a result of the commissioner’s review of relevant work papers or by the written submission or rebuttal of the insurer. The hearing shall proceed expeditiously with discovery by the insurer limited to the examiner’s work papers which tend to substantiate any assertions set forth in any written submission or rebuttal. The hearing shall proceed with the commissioner or his representative posing questions to the persons subpoenaed. Thereafter the insurer and the department may present testimony relevant to the investigation. Cross examination shall be conducted only by the commissioner or his representative. The insurer and the department shall be permitted to make closing statements and may be represented by counsel of their choice. The commissioner shall not appoint an examiner as an authorized representative to conduct the hearing but may exercise all other powers granted to him in the conduct of hearings under this code. Within twenty (20) days of the conclusion of any such hearing, the commissioner shall enter an order pursuant to paragraph (f)(i) of this section.

Upon the adoption of the examination report under paragraph (f)(i) of this section, the commissioner shall continue to hold the content of the examination report as private and confidential information for a period of thirty (30) days except to the extent provided in subsection (c) of this section. Thereafter, the commissioner may open the report for public inspection so long as no court of competent jurisdiction has stayed its publication.

Nothing contained in W.S.

26-2-116

through

26-2-124

shall require the department to disclose any information or records which would indicate or show the existence or content of any investigation or activity of a criminal justice agency. Nothing contained in this code shall prevent or be construed as prohibiting the commissioner from disclosing the content of an examination report, preliminary examination report or results, or any matter relating thereto, as authorized by and in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 26-2-113(d). In the event the commissioner determines that regulatory action is appropriate as a result of any examination, he may initiate any proceedings or actions as provided by law. The provisions of W.S.

26-2-116

through

26-2-124

with regard to release of information shall prevail should any conflict arise between this act and W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

.

All working papers, recorded information, documents and copies thereof produced by, obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in the course of an examination made under W.S.

26-2-116

through

26-2-124

, or in the course of analysis by the commissioner of the financial condition or market conduct of a company, shall be given confidential treatment and are not subject to subpoena and shall not be made public by the commissioner or any other person, except to the extent provided in subsections (j) and (k) of this section.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 146, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 57-303; C.S. 1945, § 52-203; W.S. 1957, §§ 27-50, 26.1-37; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 37; 1977, ch. 72, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1993, ch. 134, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 9, § 1; 2013 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “, or in the course of analysis by the commissioner of the financial condition or market conduct of a company,” preceding “shall be given” in (m).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this code.” —

For the definition of “this code,” referred to in subsections (h) and (k), see § 26-1-102(a)(xxxii).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).